src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BÆLLJASA !!= @CODE@ Like GÁMAS, but plural. These have corresponding singular stems.
                                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1             R                ;
                                 +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>X5ij           R                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Nom:%>X5a            K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Gen:%>X5ij           K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Acc:%>X5ijt          K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Ill:%>X5ijda         K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Ine:%>X5ijn          K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Ela:%>X5ijs          K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Com:%>X5ij           K                ;
                                       +N+Ess:%>Q1X1n          K                ;
                                       +N+Ess:%>X5in           K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Abe:%>X5ij#dagi      K                ;
                                    +N+Pl+Abe:%>X5ij#dagá      K                ;
                           +Err/Orth+N+Pl+Abe:%>X5ij#tagá      K                ;
!                                   +N+Pl+Acc:%>X5ijd%>        PxCs             ; !
!                                   +N+Pl+Ine:%>X5ijn%>        PxCs             ; !
!                                   +N+Pl+Ela:%>X5ijst%>       PxCs             ; !
!                                   +N+Pl+Gen:%>X5ij%>         PxCs             ; !^P^
!                                   +N+Pl+Ill:%>X5ijdas%>      PxC              ; !^P^
!                                   +N+Pl+Com:%>X5ij%>         PxCs             ; !^P^
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X5attja%>       K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X5attja%>j      K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X5attja%>jt     K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X5attja%>jda    K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X5attja%>jn     K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X5attja%>js     K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X5attja%>j      K                ;
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X5attja%>jd%>   PxC              ; !
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X5attja%>jn%>   PxC              ; !
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X5attja%>jst%>  PxC              ; !
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#dagi  K                ; !No Sg when it's a plural noun
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#dagá  K                ;
!         +Err/Orth+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#tagá  K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#dagi K                ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#dagá K                ;
          +Err/Orth+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#tagá K                ;
                      +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X5attja%>n      K                ;
   +Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X5adtja%>n      K                ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X5attja»tja     K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X5attja»tjij    K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X5attja»tjijt   K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X5attja»tjijda  K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X5attja»tjijn   K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X5attja»tjijs   K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X5attja»tjij    K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X5attja»tjin    K                ; !Dobbel diminutiv
!                                          +N:»                DenominalAdjsODD ; ! Don't want plural nouns to get the ahtes derivation
        ! X5 for vow change

!!€gt-norm: jiednabælljasa # Odd-syllable test
!!€ jiednabælljasa:            jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ jiednabälljasa:            jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ jiednabælljasijt:          jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ jiednabälljasijt:          jiednabælljasa+N+Pl+Acc
