src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
jiednabælljasa+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj-el:jiedna#bælljas BÆLLJASA ;
sebmasa+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sebmas BÆLLJASA ;
suoddjimbælljasa+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:suoddjim#bælljas BÆLLJASA ;
